Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 16 Teachers’ Retirement [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]
16-16-35.
Contributions.

The cost of the benefits provided in §§

16-16-25

—

16-16-38

shall be two percent (2%) of the member’s annual salary up to but not exceeding an annual salary of eleven thousand five hundred dollars ($11,500); one-half (1/2) of the cost shall be contributed by the member by deductions from his or her salary, and the other half (1/2) shall be contributed and paid by the respective city, town, or school district by which the member is employed. These contributions shall be in addition to the contributions provided in §

16-16-22

and shall be paid into the teachers’ survivors benefit fund created by §§

16-16-25

—

16-16-38

in the same manner as contributions are made under the provisions of §

16-16-22

.

In the event the market value of the teachers’ survivor benefit plan assets shall decrease below one hundred (100%) percent of the teachers’ survivor benefit plan liabilities as reported by a qualified actuary pursuant to §

16-16-37

, the retirement board shall determine and fix the amount of contributions necessary to maintain a funding level of not less than one hundred (100%) percent of assets to liabilities ratio. Any adjusted cost of the benefits provided in §§

16-16-25

—

16-16-38

shall be paid for by the member by deduction from his or her salary. These contributions shall be in addition to the contributions provided in §

16-16-22

and shall be paid into the teachers’ survivors benefit fund created by §§

16-16-25

—

16-16-38

in the same manner as contributions are made under the provisions of §

16-16-22

; provided, however, that payments to compensate for asset-to-liability ratios less than one hundred (100%) percent shall be amortized over individual ten-year (10) close periods. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter or in any other provision of Rhode Island law, no benefit enhancements, beyond the current provisions within §§ 16-16-25 — 16-16-38, shall be granted until the market value of the teachers’ survivor benefit plan assets shall increase above one hundred and twenty (120%) percent of the teachers’ survivor benefit plan liabilities as reported by a qualified actuary pursuant to §

16-16-37

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 212, § 3; P.L. 1974, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 295, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 547, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 28; P.L. 2017, ch. 412, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 413, § 2.

16-16-36.
Teachers’ survivors benefit fund.

There shall be established by the retirement board a special reserve account to be designated as the “teachers’ survivors benefit fund” and all contributions made and other money received under §§

16-16-25

through

16-16-38

shall be credited to and all payments for benefits shall be charged to this reserve account.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 212, § 3; P.L. 1974, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 295, § 1.

16-16-37.
Administration.

The retirement board shall administer and carry out the provisions of §§

16-16-25

—

16-16-38

, and shall fix the rate of regular interest payable under §§

16-16-25

—

16-16-38

to be changed from time to time, based upon the amount of interest earned by the teachers’ survivors benefit fund. The retirement board shall also cause a study and review to be made of the financial condition of the teachers’ survivors benefit fund at least once every two (2) years by a qualified actuary who shall report his or her findings and make recommendations to the board.

Any negotiated agreement entered into between any state or municipal agency or department and an employee or employees, whose conditions are contrary to the general laws or the rules and regulations and policies as adopted and promulgated by the retirement board, shall be null and void unless and until approved by formal action of the retirement board, for good cause shown.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 212, § 3; P.L. 1974, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 2, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 295, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 36; P.L. 2004, ch. 547, § 1.

16-16-38.
Social security.

Sections

16-16-25

through

16-16-38

shall not apply to teachers of any city, town, or regional school district who have elected coverage under the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq., under the provisions of chapter 7 of title 36.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 212, § 4; P.L. 1974, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 295, § 1.

16-16-39.
Severability.

The provisions of this chapter are severable and if any of its provisions are adjudged to be invalid or unconstitutional this shall not affect or impair any of the remaining provisions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 212, § 5; P.L. 1974, ch. 254, § 1.

16-16-40.
Additional benefits payable to retired teachers.

All teachers and all beneficiaries of teachers receiving any service retirement or ordinary or accidental disability retirement allowance pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and chapter 17 of this title, on or before December 31, 1967, shall receive a cost of living retirement adjustment equal to one and one-half percent (1.5%) per year of the original retirement allowance, not compounded, for each year the retirement allowance has been in effect. For purposes of computation credit shall be given for a full calendar year regardless of the effective date of the retirement allowance. This cost of living retirement adjustment shall be added to the amount of the service retirement allowance as of January 1, 1970, and payment shall begin as of July 1, 1970. An additional cost of living retirement adjustment shall be added to the original retirement allowance equal to three percent (3%) of the original retirement allowance on the first day of January, 1971, and each year thereafter through December 31, 1980.

All teachers and beneficiaries of teachers receiving any service retirement or ordinary disability retirement allowance pursuant to the provisions of this title who retired on or after January 1, 1968, shall, on the first day of January, next following the third (3rd) year on retirement, receive a cost of living adjustment, in addition to his or her retirement allowance, an amount equal to three percent (3%) of the original retirement allowance. In each succeeding year thereafter, on the first day of January, the retirement allowance shall be increased an additional three percent (3%) of the original retirement allowance, not compounded, to be continued through December 31, 1980.

Beginning on January 1, 1981, for all teachers and beneficiaries of teachers receiving any service retirement and all teachers and all beneficiaries of teachers who have completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service on or before July 1, 2005, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, and for all teachers and beneficiaries of teachers who receive a disability retirement allowance pursuant to §§

16-16-14

—

16-16-17

, the cost of living adjustment shall be computed and paid at the rate of three percent (3%) of the original retirement allowance or the retirement allowance as computed in accordance with §

16-16-40.1

, compounded annually from the year for which the cost of living adjustment was determined to be payable by the retirement board pursuant to the provisions of subsection (a) or (b) of this section. Such cost of living adjustments are available to teachers who retire before October 1, 2009, or are eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009.

The provisions of this subsection shall be deemed to apply prospectively only and no retroactive payment shall be made.

The retirement allowance of all teachers and all beneficiaries of teachers who have not completed at least ten (10) years of contributory service on or before July 1, 2005, or were not eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, shall, on the month following the third anniversary date of the retirement, and on the month following the anniversary date of each succeeding year be adjusted and computed by multiplying the retirement allowance by three percent (3%) or the percentage of increase in the Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the United States Department of Labor Statistics, determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year, whichever is less; the cost of living adjustment shall be compounded annually from the year for which the cost of living adjustment was determined payable by the retirement board; provided, that no adjustment shall cause any retirement allowance to be decreased from the retirement allowance provided immediately before such adjustment.

For teachers not eligible to retire in accordance with this chapter as of September 30, 2009, and not eligible upon passage of this article, and for their beneficiaries, the cost of living adjustment described in subsection (3) above shall only apply to the first thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) of retirement allowance, indexed annually, and shall commence upon the third (3rd) anniversary of the date of retirement or when the retiree reaches age sixty-five (65), whichever is later. The thirty-five thousand dollar ($35,000) limit shall increase annually by the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumer (CPI-U) as published by the United States Department of Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year or three percent (3%), whichever is less. The first thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000), as indexed, of retirement allowance shall be multiplied by the percentage of increase in the Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the United States Department of Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year or three percent (3%), whichever is less, on the month following the anniversary date of each succeeding year. For teachers eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, or eligible upon passage of this article, and for their beneficiaries, the provisions of this subsection (d) shall not apply.

The provisions of §§

45-13-7

—

45-13-10

shall not apply to this section.

This subsection (f) shall be effective for the period July 1, 2012, through June 30, 2015.

Notwithstanding the prior paragraphs of this section, and subject to paragraph (f)(2) below, for all present and former teachers, active and retired teachers, and beneficiaries receiving any retirement, disability or death allowance or benefit of any kind, the annual benefit adjustment provided in any calendar year under this section shall be equal to (A) multiplied by (B) where (A) is equal to the percentage determined by subtracting five and one-half percent (5.5%) (the “subtrahend”) from the Five-Year Average Investment Return of the retirement system determined as of the last day of the plan year preceding the calendar year in which the adjustment is granted, said percentage not to exceed four percent (4%) and not to be less than zero percent (0%), and (B) is equal to the lesser of the teacher’s retirement allowance or the first twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) of retirement allowance, such twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) amount to be indexed annually in the same percentage as determined under paragraph (f)(1)(A) above. The “Five-Year Average Investment Return” shall mean the average of the investment returns of the most recent five (5) plan years as determined by the retirement board. Subject to paragraph (f)(2) below, the benefit adjustment provided by this paragraph shall commence upon the third (3rd) anniversary of the date of retirement or the date on which the retiree reaches his or her Social Security retirement age, whichever is later. In the event the retirement board adjusts the actuarially assumed rate of return for the system, either upward or downward, the subtrahend shall be adjusted either upward or downward in the same amount.

Except as provided in paragraph (f)(3), the benefit adjustments under this section for any plan year shall be suspended in their entirety unless the Funded Ratio of the Employees’ Retirement System of Rhode Island, the Judicial Retirement Benefits Trust and the State Police Retirement Benefits Trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%) in which event the benefit adjustment will be reinstated for all teachers for such plan year.

In determining whether a funding level under this paragraph (f)(2) has been achieved, the actuary shall calculate the funding percentage after taking into account the reinstatement of any current or future benefit adjustment provided under this section.

Notwithstanding paragraph (f)(2), in each fifth plan year commencing after June 30, 2012, commencing with the plan year ending June 30, 2017, and subsequently at intervals of five plan years, a benefit adjustment shall be calculated and made in accordance with paragraph (f)(1) above until the Funded Ratio of the Employees’ Retirement System of Rhode Island, the Judicial Retirement Benefits Trust and the State Police Retirement Benefits Trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%).

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the provisions of this paragraph (f) of §

16-16-40

shall become effective July 1, 2012, and shall apply to any benefit adjustments not granted on or prior to June 30, 2012.

This subsection (g) shall become effective July 1, 2015.

As soon as administratively reasonable following the enactment into law of this subsection (g), a one-time benefit adjustment shall be provided to teachers and/or beneficiaries of teachers who retired on or before June 30, 2012, in the amount of two percent (2%) of the lesser of either the teacher’s retirement allowance or the first twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) of the teacher’s retirement allowance. This one-time benefit adjustment shall be provided without regard to the retiree’s age or number of years since retirement.

Notwithstanding the prior subsections of this section, for all present and former teachers, active and retired teachers, and beneficiaries receiving any retirement, disability or death allowance or benefit of any kind, the annual benefit adjustment provided in any calendar year under this section for adjustments on and after January 1, 2016, and subject to subsection (g)(2) below, shall be equal to (I) multiplied by (II):

Shall equal the sum of fifty percent (50%) of (i) plus fifty percent (50%) of (ii) where:

Is equal to the percentage determined by subtracting five and one-half percent (5.5%) (the “subtrahend”) from the five-year average investment return of the retirement system determined as of the last day of the plan year preceding the calendar year in which the adjustment is granted, said percentage not to exceed four percent (4%) and not to be less than zero percent (0%). The “five-year average investment return” shall mean the average of the investment returns of the most recent five (5) plan years as determined by the retirement board. In the event the retirement board adjusts the actuarially assumed rate of return for the system, either upward or downward, the subtrahend shall be adjusted either upward or downward in the same amount.

Is equal to the lesser of three percent (3%) or the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the U.S. Department of Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year.

In no event shall the sum of (i) plus (ii) exceed three and one-half percent (3.5%) or be less than (0%) percent.

(II)

is equal to the lesser of either the teacher’s retirement allowance or the first twenty-five thousand eight hundred and fifty-five dollars ($25,855) of retirement allowance, such amount to be indexed annually in the same percentage as determined under subsection (g)(1)(B)(I) above.

The benefit adjustments provided by this subsection (g)(1)(B) shall be provided to all retirees entitled to receive a benefit adjustment as of June 30, 2012, under the law then in effect, and for all other retirees the benefit adjustments shall commence upon the third anniversary of the date of retirement or the date on which the retiree reaches his or her Social Security retirement age, whichever is later.

Except as provided in subsection (g)(3), the benefit adjustments under subsection (g)(1)(B) for any plan year shall be suspended in their entirety unless the funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial retirement benefits trust and the state police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%) in which event the benefit adjustment will be reinstated for all teachers for such plan year.

In determining whether a funding level under this subsection (g)(2) has been achieved, the actuary shall calculate the funding percentage after taking into account the reinstatement of any current or future benefit adjustment provided under this section.

Notwithstanding subsection (g)(2), in each fourth plan year commencing after June 30, 2012, commencing with the plan year ending June 30, 2016, and subsequently at intervals of four plan years: (i) A benefit adjustment shall be calculated and made in accordance with subsection (g)(1)(B) above; and (ii) Effective for teachers and/or beneficiaries of teachers who retired on or before June 30, 2015, the dollar amount in subsection (g)(1)(B)(II) of twenty-five thousand eight hundred and fifty-five dollars ($25,855) shall be replaced with thirty-one thousand and twenty-six dollars ($31,026)until the funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial retirement benefits trust and the state police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%).

Effective for teachers and or beneficiaries of teachers who have retired on or before July 1, 2015, a one-time stipend of five hundred dollars ($500) shall be payable within sixty (60) days following the enactment of the legislation implementing this provision, and a second one-time stipend of five hundred dollars ($500) in the same month of the following year. These stipends shall be payable to all retired teachers or beneficiaries receiving a benefit as of the applicable payment date and shall not be considered cost of living adjustments under the prior provisions of this §

16-16-40

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 112, art. 10, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 237, §§ 1, 3; P.L. 1981, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 482, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 4; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 16, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 10; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 10; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 21, § 14.

16-16-40.1.
One-time adjustment to original retirement allowance.

All teachers and the beneficiaries of teachers who retired during the calendar year 1979 shall receive an additional eight percent (8%) to their original retirement allowance.

All teachers and the beneficiaries of teachers who retired during calendar year 1978 shall receive an additional two percent (2%) added to the base eight percent (8%) paid to the 1979 retirees. Provided, further that an additional two percent (2%) of the retirement allowance shall be paid for each year to a maximum of twenty percent (20%) to those retirees and beneficiaries who retired in calendar year 1973 and prior to 1973 as indicated in the following schedule:

The additional percentage shall be incorporated into the recipient’s monthly benefit starting with the payment due on or after July 31, 1986.

The provisions of §§

45-13-7

through

45-13-10

shall not apply to this section.

Year of Retirement Additional Percentage 1979 8% 1978 10% 1977 12% 1976 14% 1975 16% 1974 18% 1973 20% Years prior to 1973 20%

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 482, § 3.

16-16-41.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 113, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1981, ch. 9, § 1.

16-16-42.
Life insurance benefits.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any member who, at the time of retirement from service, has in effect life insurance provided for as a benefit of his or her employment shall, after retirement, be entitled to keep the policy of life insurance in effect by paying to the city or town an amount equal to the annual cost of the policy for the individual at the time of the individual’s retirement. The policy of insurance shall remain in effect for so long as the member continues to make annual payments.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 492, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 580, § 2.

16-16-43.
Purchase of credit while serving a prison sentence prohibited.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of the retirement law or rulings of the retirement board in accordance with the powers vested in the board, no teacher shall be allowed to purchase service credits for time while incarcerated in prison, including, but not limited to, work release programs or home confinement programs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 2, § 5.